Oklahoma, session 2026, SB161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 6962, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 306, O.S.L. 2024 (36 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6962), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6962. A. The Attorney General shall review and approve
retail pharmacy network access for all pharmacy benefits managers
(PBMs) to ensure compliance with Section 6961 of this title.
B. A PBM, or an agent of a PBM, shall not:
1. Cause or knowingly permit the use of advertisement,
promotion, solicitation, representation, proposal or offer that is
untrue, deceptive or misleading;
2. Charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a fee related to the
adjudication of a claim including without limitation a fee for:
a. the submission of a claim,
b. enrollment or participation in a retail pharmacy
network, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. the development or management of claims processing
services or claims payment services related to
participation in a retail pharmacy network;
3. Reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist in the state an amount
less than the amount that the PBM reimburses a pharmacy owned by or
under common ownership with a PBM for providing the same covered
services. The reimbursement amount paid to the pharmacy shall be
equal to the reimbursement amount calculated on a per-unit basis
using the same generic product identifier or generic code number
paid to the PBM-owned or PBM-affiliated pharmacy;
4. Deny a provider the opportunity to participate in any
pharmacy network at preferred participation status if the provider
is willing to accept the terms and conditions that the PBM has
established for other providers as a condition of preferred network
participation status;
5. Deny, limit or terminate a provider’s contract based on
employment status of any employee who has an active license to
dispense, despite probation status, with the State Board of
Pharmacy;
6. Retroactively deny or reduce reimbursement for a covered
service claim after returning a paid claim response as part of the
adjudication of the claim, unless:
a. the original claim was submitted fraudulently, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. to correct errors identified in an audit, so long as
the audit was conducted in compliance with Sections
356.2 and 356.3 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Fail to make any payment due to a pharmacy or pharmacist for
covered services properly rendered in the event a PBM terminates a
provider from a pharmacy benefits manager network;
8. Conduct or practice spread pricing, as defined in Section
6960 of this title, in this state; or
9. Charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a fee related to
participation in a retail pharmacy network including, but not
limited to, the following:
a. an application fee,
b. an enrollment or participation fee,
c. a credentialing or re-credentialing fee,
d. a change of ownership fee, or
e. a fee for the development or management of claims
processing services or claims payment services.
C. The prohibitions under this section shall apply to contracts
between pharmacy benefits managers and providers for participation
in retail pharmacy networks.
1. A PBM contract shall:
a. not restrict, directly or indirectly, any pharmacy
that dispenses a prescription drug from informing, or
penalize such pharmacy for informing, an individual of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

any differential between the individual’s out-of-
pocket cost or coverage with respect to acquisition of
the drug and the amount an individual would pay to
purchase the drug directly, and
b. ensure that any entity that provides pharmacy benefits
management services under a contract with any such
health plan or health insurance coverage does not,
with respect to such plan or coverage, restrict,
directly or indirectly, a pharmacy that dispenses a
prescription drug from informing, or penalize such
pharmacy for informing, a covered individual of any
differential between the individual’s out-of-pocket
cost under the plan or coverage with respect to
acquisition of the drug and the amount an individual
would pay for acquisition of the drug without using
any health plan or health insurance coverage.
2. A pharmacy benefits manager’s contract with a provider shall
not prohibit, restrict, or limit disclosure of information or
documents to the Attorney General, law enforcement or state and
federal governmental officials investigating or examining a
complaint or conducting a review of a pharmacy benefits manager’s
compliance with the requirements under the Patient’s Right to
Pharmacy Choice Act, the Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, and Sections
357 through 360 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. A pharmacy benefits manager shall:
1. Establish and maintain an electronic claim inquiry
processing system using the National Council for Prescription Drug
Programs’ Programs’s current standards to communicate information to
pharmacies submitting claim inquiries;
2. Fully disclose to insurers, self-funded employers, unions or
other PBM clients the existence of the respective aggregate
prescription drug discounts, rebates received from drug
manufacturers and pharmacy audit recoupments;
3. Provide the Attorney General, insurers, self-funded employer
plans and unions unrestricted audit rights of and access to the
respective PBM pharmaceutical manufacturer and provider contracts,
plan utilization data, plan pricing data, pharmacy utilization data
and pharmacy pricing data;
4. Maintain, for no less than three (3) years, documentation of
all network development activities including, but not limited to,
contract negotiations and any denials to providers to join networks.
This documentation shall be made available to the Attorney General
upon request; and
5. Report to the Attorney General, on a quarterly basis for
each health insurer payor, on the following information:
a. the aggregate amount of rebates received by the PBM,
b. the aggregate amount of rebates distributed to the
appropriate health insurer payor,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. the aggregate amount of rebates passed on to the
enrollees of each health insurer payor at the point of
sale that reduced the applicable deductible,
copayment, coinsure or other cost sharing amount of
the enrollee,
d. the individual and aggregate amount paid by the health
insurer payor to the PBM for pharmacy services
itemized by pharmacy, drug product and service
provided, and
e. the individual and aggregate amount a PBM paid a
provider for pharmacy services itemized by pharmacy,
drug product and service provided; and
6. Maintain a fiduciary duty to insurers and insureds served by
the PBM.
E. Nothing in the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice Act shall
prohibit the Attorney General from requesting and obtaining detailed
data, including raw data, in response to the information provided by
a PBM in the quarterly reports required by this section. The
Attorney General may alter the frequency of the reports required by
this section at his or her sole discretion.
F. The Attorney General may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice Act, the
Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, and Sections 357 through 360 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 20, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB161 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)